Wyoming statutes. Title 7 Criminal Procedure
Article 7. Communication Interception

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Permissible surveillance, under state communications interception statute, by person other than state or local law enforcement officer or one acting in concert with officer, 24 ALR4th 1208.

Permissible warrantless surveillance, under state communications interception statute, by state or local law enforcement officer or one acting in concert with officer, 27 ALR4th 449.

Construction and application of state statutes authorizing civil cause of action by person whose wire or oral communication is intercepted, disclosed, or used in violation of statutes, 33 ALR4th 506.

Right of immune jury witness to obtain access to government affidavits and other supporting materials in order to challenge legality of court-ordered wiretap or electronic surveillance which provided basis for questions asked in grand jury proceedings, 60 ALR Fed 706.

Delay in sealing or failure to seal tape or wire recording as required by 18 USC § 2518(8)(a) as ground for suppression of such recording at trial, 62 ALR Fed 636.

Interception of telecommunication by or with consent of party as exception, under 18 USC § 2511(2)(c) and (d), to federal proscription of such interception, 67 ALR Fed 429.

When do facts shown as probable cause for wiretap authorization under 18 USC § 2518(3) become “stale,” 68 ALR Fed 953.

What claims are sufficient to require government, pursuant to 18 USC § 3504, to affirm or deny use of unlawful electronic surveillance, 70 ALR Fed 67.

Applicability, in civil action, of provisions of Omnibus Crime Control and Safe Streets Act of 1968, prohibiting interception of communications (18 USC § 2511(1)), to interceptions by spouse, or spouse's agent, of conversations of other spouse, 139 ALR Fed 517.

§ 7-3-701.
Definitions.

As used in this act:

“Aggrieved person” means any person who was a party to any oral, wire or electronic communication intercept as defined in this act, or a person against whom the interception was directed;

“Aural transfer” means a transfer containing the human voice at any point between and including the point of origin and the point of reception;

“Communication common carrier” shall have the same meaning which is given the term “common carrier” by 47 U.S.C. § 153(10);

“Contents” when used with respect to any oral, wire or electronic communication includes any information concerning the meaning, substance or purport of the communication;

“Electronic communication” means any transfer of signs, signals, writing, images, sounds, data or intelligence of any nature transmitted in whole or in part by a wire, radio, electromagnetic, photoelectronic or photooptical system that affects interstate or foreign commerce but does not include:

Any wire or oral communication;

Any communication made through a tone-only paging device;

Any communication made through a tracking device as defined in 18 U.S.C. § 3117; or

Electronic funds transfer information stored by a financial institution in a communications system used for the electronic storage and transfer of funds.

“Electronic communication service” means any service which provides to users thereof the ability to send or receive wire or electronic communications;

“Electronic communications system” means any wire, radio, electromagnetic, photooptical or photoelectronic facilities for the transmission of electronic communications, and any computer facilities or related electronic equipment for the electronic storage of those communications;

“Electronic, mechanical or other device” means any device or apparatus which can be used to intercept a wire, oral or electronic communication, other than:

Any telephone or telegraph instrument, equipment or facility or component thereof, used in the ordinary course of business or by a peace officer in the ordinary course of his duties; or

A hearing aid or similar device being used to correct subnormal hearing to not better than normal.

“Intercept” means the aural or other acquisition of the contents of any oral, wire or electronic communication by use of an electronic, mechanical or other device;

“Judge of competent jurisdiction” means a judge of a district court;

“Oral communication” means any oral communication uttered by a person who reasonably expects and circumstances justify the expectation that the communication is not subject to interception but does not include any electronic communication;

“Peace officer” means any peace officer included in W.S. 7-2-101(a)(iv)(A), (B) or (D), other than members of a college or university police force, and includes any law enforcement officer with federal criminal enforcement jurisdiction;

“Provider of wire or electronic communication service” means any person who provides a service which consists of communications by wire, radio, electronic, laser or other transmission of energy;

“Readily accessible to the general public” means, with respect to a radio communication, that the communication is not:

Scrambled or encrypted;

Transmitted using modulation techniques whose essential parameters have been withheld from the public with the intention of preserving the privacy of the communication;

Carried on a subcarrier or other signal subsidiary to a radio transmission;

Transmitted over a communication system provided by a common carrier, unless the communication is a tone only paging system communication; or

Transmitted on frequencies allocated under part 25, subpart D, E, or F of part 74, or part 94 of the rules of the federal communications commission, unless, in the case of a communication transmitted on a frequency allocated under part 74 that is not exclusively allocated to broadcast auxiliary services, the communication is a two-way voice communication by radio.

“User” means any person or entity who:

Uses an electronic communication service; and

Is duly authorized by the provider of the service to engage in the use.

“Wire communication” means any aural transfer made in whole or in part through the use of facilities for the transmission of communications by the aid of wire, cable or other like connection, including the use of such connection in a switching station, between the point of origin and the point of reception, furnished or operated by any person engaged in providing or operating such facilities for the transmission of intrastate, interstate or foreign communications, and includes any electronic storage of such communication;

“This act” means W.S.

7-3-701

through

7-3-712

.

History.

Laws 2001, ch. 140, § 1; 2006, ch. 114, § 1.

The 2006 amendment

substituted “47 U.S.C. § 153(10)” for “47 U.S.C. § 153(h)” in (a)(iii).

Laws 2006, ch. 114, § 5, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 24, 2006.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Conflicting legislation. —

Laws 2006, ch. 114, § 3, provides: “[A]ny other act adopted by the Wyoming legislature during the same session in which this act is adopted shall be given precedence and shall prevail over the amendments in this act to the extent that such acts are in conflict with this act.”

Telephone records access not “interruption” or “interception.”—

Drug enforcement agent's acquisition of incriminatory leading information from records kept by the telephone company in its ordinary course of business was not an “interception” for purposes of former §

7-3-601

(now see this section). Wells v. State, 846 P.2d 589,

1992 Wyo. LEXIS 203

(Wyo. 1992).

Where the equipment used to track the calls to, and from, defendant's residence was equipment used by the telephone company to record connections in the interests of assessing charges in the ordinary course of its business and the information it furnished was specifically obtained for telephone company purposes, and released to the authorities only by virtue of a lawfully issued subpoena, the device was not an “electronic, mechanical or other device,” and the information obtained by virtue of this equipment was not “intercepted.” Saldana v. State, 846 P.2d 604,

1993 Wyo. LEXIS 26

(Wyo. 1993), reh'g denied,

1993 Wyo. LEXIS 34

(Wyo. Feb. 24, 1993).

Cited

in

Sheaffer v. State Ex Rel. University of Wyoming, 2006 WY 99, 139 P.3d 468,

2006 Wyo. LEXIS 103

(2006).

§ 7-3-702.
Prohibition against interception or disclosure of wire, oral or electronic communications; exceptions; penalties.

Except as provided in subsection (b) of this section, no person shall intentionally:

Intercept, attempt to intercept, or procure any other person to intercept or attempt to intercept any wire, oral or electronic communication;

Use, attempt to use, or procure any other person to use or attempt to use any electronic, mechanical or other device to intercept any oral communication when:

Such device is affixed to, or otherwise transmits a signal through, a wire, cable or other like connection used in wire communication; or

Such device transmits communications by radio or interferes with the transmission of such communication.

Disclose or attempt to disclose to another person the contents of any wire, oral or electronic communication, knowing or having reason to know that the information was obtained through the interception of a wire, oral or electronic communication in violation of this section;

Use or attempt to use the contents of any wire, oral or electronic communication knowing or having reason to know that the information was obtained through the interception of a wire, oral or electronic communication in violation of this section;

Disclose, or attempt to disclose, to any other person the contents of any wire, oral or electronic communication, intercepted by means authorized by this act:

Knowing or having reason to know that the information was obtained through the interception of such a communication in connection with a criminal investigation;

Having obtained or received the information in connection with a criminal investigation; and

With intent to improperly obstruct, impede or interfere with a duly authorized criminal investigation.

Nothing in subsection (a) of this section prohibits:

An operator of a switchboard, or an officer, employee or agent of a wire or electronic communication service whose facilities are used in the transmission of a wire communication from intercepting, disclosing or using a wire or electronic communication intercepted in the normal course of that person’s employment while engaged in any activity which is a necessary incident to the rendition of his service or to the protection of the rights or property of the provider of that service, except that a provider of wire communication service to the public shall not utilize service observing or random monitoring except for mechanical or service quality control checks;

An officer, employee or agent of any provider of wire or electronic communications service, landlords, custodians or other persons from providing information, facilities or technical assistance to a peace officer who is authorized pursuant to this act to intercept a wire, oral or electronic communication if any such person has been provided with a court order directing such assistance. No provider of wire or electronic communication service, officer, employee or agent thereof, or landlord, custodian or other specified person shall disclose the existence of any interception or surveillance or the device used to accomplish the interception or surveillance with respect to which the person has been furnished a court order under this act, except as may otherwise be required by legal process and then only after prior notification to the attorney general. Any such disclosure, shall render such person liable for the civil damages provided for in W.S.

7-3-710

. No criminal or civil cause of action shall lie in any court against any provider of wire or electronic communication service, its officers, employees or agents, landlord, custodian or other specified person for providing information, facilities or assistance in accordance with the terms of a court order under this act;

An officer, employee or agent of the federal communications commission, in the normal course of his employment and in discharge of the monitoring responsibilities exercised by the commission in the enforcement of 47 U.S.C. § 151 et seq., from intercepting a wire or electronic communication, or oral communication transmitted by radio, or disclosing or using the information thereby obtained;

Any person from intercepting an oral, wire or electronic communication where the person is a party to the communication or where one (1) of the parties to the communication has given prior consent to the interception unless the communication is intercepted for the purpose of committing any criminal or tortious act;

A peace officer from intercepting, using or disclosing to another peace officer in the course of his official duties any wire, oral or electronic communication pursuant to an order permitting the interception under this act;

An employee of a telephone company from intercepting a wire communication for the sole purpose of tracing the origin of the communication upon request by the recipient of the communication who alleges that the communication is obscene, harassing or threatening in nature. The person conducting the interception shall notify local law enforcement authorities of the interception within forty-eight (48) hours;

A person from intercepting or accessing an electronic communication made through an electronic communication system that is configured so that the electronic communication is readily accessible to the general public;

A person from intercepting any radio communication which is transmitted:

By any station for the use of the general public, or that relates to ships, aircraft, vehicles or persons in distress;

By any governmental, law enforcement, civil defense, private land mobile or public safety communications system, including police and fire, readily accessible to the general public;

By a station operating on an authorized frequency within the bands allocated to the amateur, citizens band or general mobile radio services; or

By any marine or aeronautical communications system.

A person from intercepting any wire or electronic communication the transmission of which is causing harmful interference to any lawfully operating station or consumer electronic equipment, to the extent necessary to identify the source of such interference;

Other users of the same frequency to intercept any radio communication made through a system that utilizes frequencies monitored by individuals engaged in the provision or the use of the system, if the communication is not scrambled or encrypted; or

Conduct described in this paragraph unless the conduct is for the purposes of direct or indirect commercial advantage or private financial gain. Conduct that consists of or relates to the interception of a satellite transmission that is not encrypted or scrambled and that is transmitted:

To a broadcasting station for purposes of retransmission to the general public; or

As an audio subcarrier intended for redistribution to facilities open to the public, but not including data transmissions or telephone calls.

It shall not be unlawful under this act:

To use a pen register or a trap and trace device authorized by article 8 of this chapter; or

For a provider of electronic communication service to record the fact that a wire or electronic communication was initiated or completed in order to protect such provider, another provider furnishing service toward the completion of the wire or electronic communication, or a user of that service, from fraudulent, unlawful or abusive use of such service.

Except as provided in subsection (e) of this section, a person or entity providing an electronic communication service to the public shall not intentionally divulge the contents of any communication (other than one to such person or entity, or an agent thereof) while in transmission on that service to any person or entity other than an addressee or intended recipient of such communication or an agent of such addressee or intended recipient.

A person or entity providing electronic communication service to the public may divulge the contents of any such communication:

As otherwise authorized in W.S. 7-3-702(b)(i), (ii) or

7-3-706

;

With the lawful consent of the originator or any addressee or intended recipient of such communication;

To a person employed or authorized, or whose facilities are used, to forward such communication to its destination; or

Which were inadvertently obtained by the service provider and which appear to pertain to the commission of a crime, if such divulgence is made to a law enforcement agency.

Except as otherwise provided in this subsection, any person who violates this section is guilty of a felony punishable by a fine of not more than one thousand dollars ($1,000.00), imprisonment for not more than five (5) years, or both. If the intercepted communication is the radio portion of a cellular telephone communication, a cordless telephone communication that is transmitted between the cordless handset and the base unit, a public land mobile radio service communication or a paging service communication, a violation of this section is a misdemeanor punishable by a fine of not more than seven hundred fifty dollars ($750.00), imprisonment for not more than six (6) months, or both.

History.

Laws 2001, ch. 140, § 1.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 7-3-701(a)(xvii).

No right of privacy in criminal activity. —

Participant monitoring without a warrant or court order pursuant to Wyoming's Communication Interception Act does not violate art. 1, § 4, Wyo. Const., because the accused assumes the risk of disclosure by engaging in criminal activity with another, forfeiting the reasonable expectation of privacy which might otherwise sustain a constitutional challenge to the evidence. Almada v. State, 994 P.2d 299,

1999 Wyo. LEXIS 192

(Wyo. 1999) (decided under prior law).

No violation for use of telephone records. —

Where drug enforcement agent acquired incriminatory leading information from records kept by the telephone company in its ordinary course of business, no “interception” occurred, and there was no consequent violation of this section. Wells v. State, 846 P.2d 589,

1992 Wyo. LEXIS 203

(Wyo. 1992) (decided under prior law).

Court order not required under (b)(iv). —

Only subsection (b)(v) refers to “an order permitting the interception under this act,” and thus no such order was required, and §§ 7-3-605 and 7-3-606 [now see §§

7-3-705

and

7-3-707

] were not implicated when law enforcement officers intercepted the communication the informant had with defendant during the drug transaction. Almada v. State, 994 P.2d 299,

1999 Wyo. LEXIS 192

(Wyo. 1999) (decided under prior law).

Private right of action.—

Although plaintiff
invoked this section, plaintiff cited no authority for the proposition
that this section gave him right to sue governmental defendants because
they convinced him to erase recording that he made; as plaintiff
was
not being criminally prosecuted, this section did not apply. Serna v. BLM Worland Field Office, 614 Fed. Appx. 384, 2015 U.S. App. LEXIS 16398 (10th Cir. Wyo. 2015), cert. denied, 577 U.S. 1156, 136 S. Ct. 1197, 194 L. Ed. 2d 206, 2016 U.S. LEXIS 1547 (U.S. 2016).

Cited

in

Sheaffer v. State Ex Rel. University of Wyoming, 2006 WY 99, 139 P.3d 468,

2006 Wyo. LEXIS 103

(2006).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Chapter 5 of 47 U.S.C., referred to in subsection (b)(iii), appears as 47 U.S.C. §§ 151 through 611. 44 ALR4th 841.

Eavesdropping on extension telephone as invasion of privacy, 49 ALR4th 430.

Intrusion by news-gathering entity as invasion of right of privacy, 69 ALR4th 1059.

“Caller ID” system, allowing telephone call recipient to ascertain number of telephone from which call originated, as violation of right to privacy, wiretapping statute, or similar protections, 9 ALR5th 553.

Construction and application of § 2A6.1 of United States Sentencing Guidelines (U.S.S.G. § 2A6.1), pertaining to sentence to be imposed for making threatening communications, 148 ALR Fed 501.

Construction and application of provision of Omnibus Crime Control and Safe Streets Act of 1968 (18 U.S.C. § 2520) authorizing civil cause of action by person whose wire, oral, or electronic communication is intercepted, disclosed, or used in violation of Act, 164 ALR Fed 139.

§ 7-3-703.
Prohibition against manufacture and possession of wire, oral or electronic communication intercepting devices; exceptions; penalties.

Except as provided in subsection (b) of this section, no person shall intentionally manufacture, assemble, possess, sell or offer for sale any electronic, mechanical or other device, knowing or having reason to know that the design of the device renders it primarily useful for the purpose of the surreptitious interception of wire, oral or electronic communications.

Nothing in subsection (a) of this section prohibits an officer, agent, employee of or person under contract with or bidding upon contract with a provider of wire or electronic communication services, the United States, a state or a political subdivision thereof, in the normal course of the activities of the United States, a state or a political subdivision thereof, to send through the mail, send or carry in interstate or foreign commerce, or manufacture, assemble, possess or sell any electronic, mechanical or other device, knowing or having reason to know that the design of the device renders it primarily useful for the purpose of the surreptitious interception of wire, oral or electronic communications.

Nothing in subsection (a) of this section shall prohibit the manufacture, possession or use of an electronic or mechanical device to access a communication system that is configured so that the communication is readily accessible to the public.

Any person who violates this section is guilty of a felony punishable as provided in W.S. 7-3-702(f) for felony violations.

History.

Laws 2001, ch. 140, § 1.

§ 7-3-704.
Seizure and forfeiture of wire or oral communication intercepting devices.

Any electronic, mechanical or other device manufactured, assembled, used, sold or possessed in violation of this act may be seized by any peace officer upon process issued by any district court or district court commissioner having jurisdiction over the property, or without process if the seizure is incident to an arrest or a search under a search warrant or if the peace officer seizing the device has probable cause to believe the property was used or is intended to be used in violation of this act. Devices subject to seizure under this act are contraband subject to forfeiture in accordance with law.

History.

Laws 2001, ch. 140, § 1.

Cross references. —

As to district court commissioners, see §

5-3-301

.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 7-3-701(a)(xvii).

§ 7-3-705.
Authorization for interception of wire, oral or electronic communications.

The attorney general or the district attorney within whose jurisdiction the order is sought in conjunction with the attorney general, may authorize an application to a judge of competent jurisdiction for an order authorizing the interception of wire, oral or electronic communications by the Wyoming division of criminal investigation, federal criminal law enforcement agency or any law enforcement agency of the state having responsibility for investigation of the offense for which the application is made, if the interception may provide evidence of an attempt to commit, conspiracy to commit, solicitation to commit or the commission of any of the following felony offenses or comparable crimes in any other jurisdiction:

Violations of the Wyoming Controlled Substances Act of 1971;

Any of the following, if incident to or discovered during investigation of a violation of the Wyoming Controlled Substances Act of 1971:

Murder as defined in W.S.

6-2-101

and

6-2-104

;

Kidnapping or related felony offense as defined in W.S.

6-2-201

,

6-2-202

and

6-2-204

;

First or second degree sexual assault as defined in W.S.

6-2-302

and

6-2-303

;

Robbery as defined in W.S.

6-2-401

;

Blackmail as defined in W.S.

6-2-402

;

Burglary as defined in W.S.

6-3-301

; or

Felony theft or related felony offense defined in W.S.

6-3-402

.

History.

Laws 2001, ch. 140, § 1; 2013 ch. 191, § 2, effective July 1, 2013; 2020 ch. 90, § 1, effective July 1, 2020.

Cross references. —

As to division of criminal investigation, see §

9-1-611

.

The 2013 amendment,

effective July 1, 2013, in (a)(ii)(G), substituted “theft” for “larceny” and added “or

6-3-413

” at the end.

The 2020 amendment,

effective July 1, 2020, in (a)(ii)(G) substituted “W.S.

6-3-402

” for “W.S.

6-3-401

through

6-3-410

or

6-3-413

.”

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Wyoming Controlled Substances Act of 1971. —

See §§

35-7-1001

, 35-7-1002(a)(xxviii).

§ 7-3-706.
Authorization for disclosure and use of intercepted communications.

Any peace officer who, by any means authorized by this act, has obtained knowledge of the contents of any wire, oral or electronic communication, or evidence derived therefrom, may disclose such contents to another peace officer to the extent that the disclosure is appropriate to the proper performance of the official duties of the officer making or receiving the disclosure.

Any peace officer who, by any means authorized by this act, has obtained knowledge of the contents of any wire, oral or electronic communication or evidence derived therefrom may use such contents to the extent the use is appropriate to the proper performance of his official duties.

Any person who has received, by any means authorized by this act, any information concerning a wire, oral or electronic communication, or evidence derived therefrom intercepted in accordance with the provisions of this act, may disclose the contents of that communication or the derivative evidence while giving testimony under oath or affirmation in any proceeding held under the authority of the state or political subdivision thereof.

History.

Laws 2001, ch. 140, § 1.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 7-3-701(a)(xvii).